Idaho, session 2026, H0639.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-5504, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5504. RULEMAKING. (1) The rules adopted by the board shall:
(a) Allow a midwife to obtain and administer, during the practice of
midwifery, the following:
(i) Oxygen;
(ii) Oxytocin, misoprostol, and methylergonovine as postpartum
antihemorrhagic agents;
(iii) Injectable local anesthetic for the repair of lacerations
that are no more extensive than second degree;
(iv) Antibiotics to the mother for group b streptococcus prophy-
laxis consistent with guidelines of the United States centers for
disease control and prevention;
(v) Epinephrine to the mother administered for anaphylactic
shock;
(vi) Intravenous fluids for stabilization of the mother;
(vii) Rho (D) immune globulin;
(viii) Phytonadione; and
(ix) Eye prophylactics to the child.
(b) Prohibit the use of other legend drugs, except those of a similar
nature and character as determined by the board to be consistent with
the practice of midwifery; provided that at least one hundred twenty
(120) days' advance notice of the proposal to allow the use of such drugs
is given to the board of pharmacy and the board of medicine and neither
board objects to the addition of such drugs to the midwifery formulary;
(c) (a) Define a formulary and protocol for use by licensed midwives of
drugs approved in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection indicated
for maternal care or neonatal care, as provided for in section 54-5504A,
Idaho Code, that shall include methods of obtaining, storing, and dis-


posing of such drugs and an indication for use, dosage, route of admin-
istration, and duration of treatment;
(d) (b) Define a protocol for medical waste disposal; and
(e) (c) Establish scope and practice standards for antepartum, intra-
partum, postpartum, and newborn care that shall, at a minimum:
(i) Prohibit a licensed midwife from providing care for a client
with a history of disorders, diagnoses, conditions, or symptoms
that include:
1. Placental abnormality;
2. Multiple gestation, except that midwives may provide an-
tepartum care that is supplementary to the medical care of
the physician overseeing the pregnancy, as long as it does
not interfere with the physician's recommended schedule of
care;
3. Noncephalic presentation at the onset of labor or rupture
of membranes, whichever occurs first;
4. Birth under thirty-seven and zero-sevenths (37 0/7)
weeks and beyond forty-two and zero-sevenths (42 0/7) weeks
gestational age;
5. A history of more than one (1) prior cesarean section,
a cesarean section within eighteen (18) months of the esti-
mated due date or any cesarean section that was surgically
closed with a classical or vertical uterine incision;
6. Platelet sensitization, hematological, or coagulation
disorders;
7. A body mass index of forty (40.0) or higher at the time of
conception;
8. Prior chemotherapy and/or radiation treatment for a ma-
lignancy;
9. Previous preeclampsia resulting in premature delivery;
10. Cervical insufficiency;
11. HIV positive status; or
12. Opiate use that places the infant at risk of neonatal ab-
stinence syndrome.
(ii) Prohibit a licensed midwife from providing care for a client
with a history of the following disorders, diagnoses, conditions,
or symptoms, unless such disorders, diagnoses, conditions, or
symptoms are being treated, monitored, or managed by a licensed
health care provider:
1. Diabetes;
2. Thyroid disease;
3. Epilepsy;
4. Hypertension;
5. Cardiac disease;
6. Pulmonary disease;
7. Renal disease;
8. Gastrointestinal disorders;
9. Previous major surgery of the pulmonary system, cardio-
vascular system, urinary tract, or gastrointestinal tract;
10. Abnormal cervical cytology;


11. Sleep apnea;
12. Previous bariatric surgery;
13. Hepatitis;
14. History of illegal drug use or excessive prescription
drug use; or
15. Rh or other blood group disorders and a physician deter-
mines the pregnancy can safely be attended by a midwife.
(iii) Require a licensed midwife to recommend that a client see
a physician licensed pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho
Code, or an equivalent provision of the law of a state bordering
Idaho and to document and maintain a record as required by section
54-5510, Idaho Code, if such client has a history of disorders,
diagnoses, conditions, or symptoms that include:
1. Previous complicated pregnancy;
2. Previous cesarean section;
3. Previous pregnancy loss in second or third trimester;
4. Previous spontaneous premature labor;
5. Previous preterm rupture of membranes;
6. Previous preeclampsia;
7. Previous hypertensive disease of pregnancy;
8. Parvo;
9. Toxo;
10. CMV;
11. HSV;
12. Previous maternal/newborn group b streptococcus infec-
tion;
13. A body mass index of at least thirty-five (35.0) but less
than forty (40.0) at the time of conception;
14. Underlying family genetic disorders with potential for
transmission; or
15. Psychosocial situations that may complicate pregnancy.
(iv) Require that a licensed midwife facilitate the immediate
transfer to a hospital for emergency care for disorders, diag-
noses, conditions, or symptoms that include:
1. Maternal fever in labor;
2. Suggestion of fetal jeopardy, such as bleeding or meco-
nium or abnormal fetal heart tones;
3. Noncephalic presentation at the onset of labor or rup-
ture of membranes, whichever occurs first, unless imminent
delivery is safer than transfer;
4. Second-stage labor after two (2) hours of initiation of
pushing when the mother has had a previous cesarean section;
5. Current spontaneous premature labor;
6. Current preterm premature rupture of membranes;
7. Current preeclampsia;
8. Current hypertensive disease of pregnancy;
9. Continuous uncontrolled bleeding;
10. Bleeding that necessitates the administration of more
than two (2) doses of oxytocin or other antihemorrhagic


agent does not respond to the administration of antihemor-
rhagic agents;
11. Delivery injuries to the bladder or bowel;
12. Grand mal seizure;
13. Uncontrolled vomiting;
14. Coughing or vomiting of blood;
15. Severe chest pain; or
16. Sudden onset of shortness of breath and associated la-
bored breathing.
A transfer of care shall be accompanied by the client's medical
record, the licensed midwife's assessment of the client's current
condition, and a description of the care provided by the licensed
midwife prior to transfer;
(v) Establish a written plan for the emergency transfer and
transport required in subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph and for
notifying the hospital to which a client will be transferred in
the case of an emergency. If a client is transferred in an emer-
gency, the licensed midwife shall notify the hospital when the
transfer is initiated and accompany the client to the hospital if
feasible, or communicate by telephone with the hospital if unable
to be present personally, and shall provide the client's medi-
cal record. The record shall include the client's name, address,
list of diagnosed medical conditions, list of prescription or
over-the-counter medications regularly taken, history of previ-
ous allergic reactions to medications, if feasible, the client's
current medical condition and description of the care provided by
the midwife, and next-of-kin contact information. A midwife who
deems it necessary to transfer or terminate care pursuant to this
section and any rules promulgated pursuant to this section or for
any other reason shall transfer or terminate care and shall not be
regarded as having abandoned care or wrongfully terminated ser-
vices. Before nonemergent discontinuing of services, the midwife
shall notify the client in writing, provide the client with names
of licensed physicians and contact information for the nearest
hospital emergency room, and offer to provide copies of medical
records regardless of whether copying costs have been paid by the
client.
(f) (d) Establish and operate a system of peer review for licensed
midwives that shall include but not be limited to the appropriateness,
quality, utilization, and ethical performance of midwifery care.
(2) The rules adopted by the board may not:
(a) Require a licensed midwife to have a nursing degree or diploma;
(b) Except as a condition imposed by disciplinary proceedings by the
board, require a licensed midwife to practice midwifery under the su-
pervision of another health care provider;
(c) Except as a condition imposed by disciplinary proceedings by the
board, require a licensed midwife to enter into an agreement, written or
otherwise, with another health care provider;
(d) Limit the location where a licensed midwife may practice midwifery;


(e) Allow a licensed midwife to use vacuum extraction or forceps as an
aid in the delivery of a newborn;
(f) Grant a licensed midwife prescriptive privilege; or
(g) Allow a licensed midwife to perform abortions.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 55, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-5504A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-5504A. MEDICATIONS. A licensed midwife may obtain and administer
any medication indicated for maternal care or neonatal care defined in the
formulary and protocol for which the midwife possesses the requisite educa-
tion, training, and experience. Administration of such medication shall be
performed within the acceptable community standard of care.
SECTION 3. That Section 54-5510, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5510. DISCLOSURE AND RECORDKEEPING -- LICENSE RENEWAL. (1) Before
initiating care, a licensed midwife shall obtain a signed informed consent
agreement from each client, acknowledging receipt, at a minimum, of the fol-
lowing:
(a) The licensed midwife's training and experience;
(b) Instructions for obtaining a copy of the rules adopted by the board
pursuant to this chapter;
(c) Instructions for obtaining a copy of the NACPM essential documents
and NARM job description;
(d) Instructions for filing complaints with the board;
(e) Notice of whether or not the licensed midwife has professional lia-
bility insurance coverage;
(f) A written protocol for emergencies, including hospital transport,
that is specific to each individual client;
(g) A description of the procedures, benefits, and risks of home birth,
primarily those conditions that may arise during delivery; and
(h) Any other information required by board rule.
(2) All licensed midwives shall maintain a record of all signed in-
formed consent agreements for each client for a minimum of nine (9) years
after the last day of care for such client.
(3) Before providing care for a client who has a history of disorders,
diagnoses, conditions, or symptoms identified in section 54-5504(1)(e)(ii)
54-5504(1)(c)(ii), Idaho Code, the licensed midwife shall provide writ-
ten notice to the client that the client must obtain care from a physician
licensed pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, as a condition
to her eligibility to obtain maternity care from the licensed midwife.
Before providing care for a client who has a history of disorders, diag-
noses, conditions, or symptoms identified in section 54-5504(1)(e)(iii)
54-5504(1)(c)(iii), Idaho Code, or who has had a previous cesarean section,
the licensed midwife shall provide written notice to the client that the
client is advised to consult with a physician licensed pursuant to chapter
18, title 54, Idaho Code, during her pregnancy. The midwife shall obtain the
client's signed acknowledgment of receipt of said notice.


(4) Any licensed midwife submitting an application to renew a license
shall compile and submit to the board complete practice data for the calendar
year preceding the date of the application. Such information shall be pro-
vided in form and content as prescribed by rule of the board and shall include
but not be limited to:
(a) The number of clients to whom care has been provided by the licensed
midwife;
(b) The number of deliveries performed by the licensed midwife;
(c) The apgar scores of the infants delivered by the licensed midwife;
(d) The number of prenatal transfers;
(e) The number of transfers during labor, during delivery, and immedi-
ately following birth;
(f) Any perinatal deaths; and
(g) Other morbidity statistics as required by the board.
SECTION 4. The rules contained in IDAPA 24.26.01., Idaho Board of Mid-
wifery, relating to Protocols for the Use of Formulary Drugs, Section 200.,
Subsection 01., shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.